Illinois, session 104th, SB1711.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-229 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/6-229)7    Sec. 6-229. Provisions applicable to new hires; Tier 2.8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 9the provisions of this Section apply to a person who first 10becomes a fireman under this Article on or after January 1, 112011, and to certain qualified survivors of such a fireman. 12Such persons, and the benefits and restrictions that apply 13specifically to them under this Article, may be referred to as 14"Tier 2".15    (b) A fireman who has withdrawn from service, has attained 16age 50 or more, and has 10 or more years of service in that 17capacity shall be entitled, upon proper application being 18received by the Fund, to receive a Tier 2 monthly retirement 19annuity for his service as a fireman. The Tier 2 monthly 20retirement annuity shall be computed by multiplying 2.5% for 21each year of such service by his or her final average salary, 22subject to an annuity reduction factor of one-half of 1% for 23each month that the fireman's age at retirement is under age   SB1711- 2 -LRB104 10762 RPS 20842 b155. The Tier 2 monthly retirement annuity is in lieu of any age 2and service annuity or other form of retirement annuity under 3this Article.4    The maximum retirement annuity under this subsection (b) 5shall be 75% of final average salary.6    For the purposes of this subsection (b), "final average 7salary" means the greater of (1) the average monthly salary 8obtained by dividing the total salary of the fireman during 9the 96 consecutive months of service within the last 120 10months of service in which the total salary was the highest by 11the number of months of service in that period or (2) the 12average monthly salary obtained by dividing the total salary 13of the fireman during the 48 consecutive months of service 14within the last 60 months of service in which the total salary 15was the highest by the number of months of service in that 16period.17    Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under this 18Code (including without limitation the calculation of benefits 19and employee contributions), the annual salary based on the 20plan year of a member or participant to whom this Section 21applies shall not exceed $106,800; however, through 2025, that 22amount shall annually thereafter be increased by the lesser of 23(i) 3% of that amount, including all previous adjustments, or 24(ii) one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but 25not less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 26months ending with the September preceding each November 1,   SB1711- 3 -LRB104 10762 RPS 20842 b1including all previous adjustments; however, beginning in 22026, that amount shall annually thereafter be increased by 3the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all previous 4adjustments, or (ii) the annual unadjusted percentage increase 5(but not less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 612 months ending with the September preceding each November 1, 7including all previous adjustments.8    (b-5) For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price 9index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 10Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 11measures the average change in prices of goods and services 12purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average, 13all items, 1982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each 14annual adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension 15Division of the Department of Insurance and made available to 16the boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by 17November 1 of each year. 18    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 19for a person who first becomes a fireman under this Article on 20or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for and the amount of the 21annuity to which the qualified surviving spouse, children, and 22parents of the fireman are entitled under this subsection (c) 23shall be determined as follows:24        (1) The surviving spouse of a deceased fireman to whom 25    this Section applies shall be deemed qualified to receive 26    a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under this paragraph   SB1711- 4 -LRB104 10762 RPS 20842 b1    (1) if: (i) the deceased fireman meets the requirements 2    specified under subdivision (A), (B), (C), or (D) of this 3    paragraph (1); and (ii) the surviving spouse would not 4    otherwise be excluded from receiving a widow's annuity 5    under the eligibility requirements for a widow's annuity 6    set forth in Section 6-142. The Tier 2 surviving spouse's 7    annuity is in lieu of the widow's annuity determined under 8    any other Section of this Article and is subject to the 9    requirements of Section 6-143.2.10        As used in this subsection (c), "earned pension" means 11    a Tier 2 monthly retirement annuity determined under 12    subsection (b) of this Section, including any increases 13    the fireman had received pursuant to Section 6-164. 14            (A) If the deceased fireman was receiving an 15        earned pension at the date of his or her death, the 16        Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under this paragraph 17        (1) shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the fireman's 18        earned pension at the date of death.19            (B) If the deceased fireman was not receiving an 20        earned pension but had at least 10 years of service at 21        the time of death, the Tier 2 surviving spouse's 22        annuity under this paragraph (1) shall be the greater 23        of: (i) 30% of the salary attached to the rank of first 24        class firefighter in the classified career service at 25        the time of the fireman's death; or (ii) 66 2/3% of the 26        Tier 2 monthly retirement annuity that the deceased   SB1711- 5 -LRB104 10762 RPS 20842 b1        fireman would have been eligible to receive under 2        subsection (b) of this Section, based upon the actual 3        service accrued through the day before the fireman's 4        death, but determined as though the fireman was at 5        least age 55 on the day before his or her death and 6        retired on that day.7            (C) If the deceased fireman was an active fireman 8        with at least 1 1/2 but less than 10 years of service 9        at the time of death, the Tier 2 surviving spouse's 10        annuity under this paragraph (1) shall be in the 11        amount of 30% of the salary attached to the rank of 12        first class firefighter in the classified career 13        service at the time of the fireman's death.14            (D) Notwithstanding subdivisions (A), (B), and (C) 15        of this paragraph (1), if the performance of an act or 16        acts of duty results directly in the death of a fireman 17        subject to this Section, or prevents him from 18        subsequently resuming active service in the fire 19        department, then a surviving spouse who would 20        otherwise meet the eligibility requirements for a 21        death in the line of duty widow's annuity granted 22        under Section 6-140 shall be deemed to be qualified 23        for a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under this 24        subdivision (D); except that no such annuity shall be 25        paid to the surviving spouse of a fireman who dies 26        while in receipt of disability benefits when the   SB1711- 6 -LRB104 10762 RPS 20842 b1        fireman's death was caused by an intervening illness 2        or injury unrelated to the illness or injury that had 3        prevented him from subsequently resuming active 4        service in the fire department. The Tier 2 surviving 5        spouse's annuity calculated under this subdivision (D) 6        shall be in lieu of, but in the same amount and paid in 7        the same manner as, the widow's annuity provided under 8        Section 6-140; except that the salary used for 9        computing a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under 10        this subdivision (D) shall be subject to the Tier 2 11        salary cap provided under subsection (b) of this 12        Section.13            (E) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 14        Article, the monthly Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity 15        under subdivision (A) or (B) of this paragraph (1) 16        shall be increased on the January 1 next occurring 17        after (i) attainment of age 60 by the recipient of the 18        Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity or (ii) the first 19        anniversary of the Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity 20        start date, whichever is later, and on each January 1 21        thereafter, by 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted 22        percentage increase in the consumer price index-u for 23        the 12 months ending with September preceding each 24        November 1, whichever is less, of the originally 25        granted Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity. If the 26        annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer   SB1711- 7 -LRB104 10762 RPS 20842 b1        price index-u for a 12-month period ending in 2        September is zero or, when compared with the preceding 3        period, decreases, then the annuity shall not be 4        increased.5            (F) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this 6        paragraph (1), for a qualified surviving spouse who is 7        entitled to a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under 8        subdivision (A), (B), (C), or (D) of this paragraph 9        (1), that Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity shall not 10        be less than the amount of the minimum widow's annuity 11        established from time to time under Section 6-128.4.12        (2) Surviving children of a deceased fireman subject 13    to this Section who would otherwise meet the eligibility 14    requirements for a child's annuity set forth in Sections 15    6-147 and 6-148 shall be deemed qualified to receive a 16    Tier 2 child's annuity under this subsection (c), which 17    shall be in lieu of, but in the same amount and paid in the 18    same manner as, the child's annuity provided under those 19    Sections; except that any salary used for computing a Tier 20    2 child's annuity shall be subject to the Tier 2 salary cap 21    provided under subsection (b) of this Section. For 22    purposes of determining any pro rata reduction in child's 23    annuities under this subsection (c), references in Section 24    6-148 to the combined annuities of the family shall be 25    deemed to refer to the combined Tier 2 surviving spouse's 26    annuity, if any, and the Tier 2 child's annuities payable   SB1711- 8 -LRB104 10762 RPS 20842 b1    under this subsection (c).2        (3) Surviving parents of a deceased fireman subject to 3    this Section who would otherwise meet the eligibility 4    requirements for a parent's annuity set forth in Section 5    6-149 shall be deemed qualified to receive a Tier 2 6    parent's annuity under this subsection (c), which shall be 7    in lieu of, but in the same amount and paid in the same 8    manner as, the parent's annuity provided under Section 9    6-149; except that any salary used for computing a Tier 2 10    parent's annuity shall be subject to the Tier 2 salary cap 11    provided under subsection (b) of this Section. For the 12    purposes of this Section, a reference to "annuity" in 13    Section 6-149 includes: (i) in the context of a widow, a 14    Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity and (ii) in the context 15    of a child, a Tier 2 child's annuity.16    (d) The General Assembly finds and declares that the 17provisions of this Section, as enacted by Public Act 96-1495, 18require clarification relating to necessary eligibility 19standards and the manner of determining and paying the 20intended Tier 2 benefits and contributions in order to enable 21the Fund to unambiguously implement and administer benefits 22for Tier 2 members. The changes to this Section and the 23conforming changes to Sections 6-150, 6-158, 6-164 (except for 24the changes to subsection (a) of that Section), 6-166, and 256-167 made by this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly 26are enacted to clarify the provisions of this Section as   SB1711- 9 -LRB104 10762 RPS 20842 b1enacted by Public Act 96-1495, and are hereby declared to 2represent and be consistent with the original and continuing 3intent of this Section and Public Act 96-1495.4    (e) The changes to Sections 6-150, 6-158, 6-164 (except 5for the changes to subsection (a) of that Section), 6-166, and 66-167 made by this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly 7are intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the 8effective date of Public Act 96-1495) and, for the purposes of 9Section 1-103.1 of this Code, they apply without regard to 10whether the relevant fireman was in service on or after the 11effective date of this amendatory Act of the 99th General 12Assembly. 13(Source: P.A. 103-579, eff. 12-8-23.) 14    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 15Section 8.49 as follows: 16    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)17    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 188 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 19the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 20Act of the 104th General Assembly. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.